lb_LU.aff
FLAG long
SFX u0 Y 42
SFX u0 aass ässer aass is:plural
SFX u0 ach ächer [^g][fl]ach is:plural
SFX u0 ad ieder ad is:plural
SFX u0 äis eiser äis is:plural
SFX u0 as ieser as is:plural
SFX u0 ass ässer [^a]ass is:plural
SFX u0 at ieder at is:plural
SFX u0 d ner [Kk]and is:plural
SFX u0 and änner [^Kk]and is:plural
SFX u0 ann änner ann is:plural
SFX u0 f wer [ueé][ei]f is:plural
SFX u0 d ter [ëe][ln]d is:plural
SFX u0 alt älter alt is:plural
SFX u0 t der iet is:plural
SFX u0 d ler ild is:plural
SFX u0 tt dder itt is:plural
SFX u0 ong énger ong is:plural
SFX u0 uch icher [^a]uch is:plural
SFX u0 uerf ierfer uerf is:plural
SFX u0 uert ierder uert is:plural
SFX u0 um emer um is:plural
SFX u0 us iser us is:plural
SFX u0 ott ëtter ott is:plural
SFX u0 ascht äschter ascht is:plural
SFX u0 llef alwer llef is:plural
SFX u0 och écher och is:plural
SFX u0 ond ënner ond is:plural
SFX u0 all äller all is:plural
SFX u0 ollek ëlker ollek is:plural
SFX u0 af iewer af is:plural
SFX u0 ol eeler ol is:plural
SFX u0 amt ämter amt is:plural
SFX u0 auch äicher auch is:plural
SFX u0 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX u0 ach äicher glach is:plural
SFX u0 ach ächer [FL]ach is:plural
SFX u0 chen ërcher hen is:plural
SFX u0 aach äächer aach is:plural
SFX u0 oft ëfter oft is:plural
SFX u0 ut ider ut is:plural
SFX u0 olz ëlzer olz is:plural
SFX u0 utt idder utt is:plural

SFX t0 Y 17
SFX t0 aaft äften/f0 aaft is:plural
SFX t0 d ten/f0 [^d]d is:plural
SFX t0 dd tten/f0 dd is:plural
SFX t0 f wen/f0 [^e]f is:plural
SFX t0 isch jen/f0 isch is:plural
SFX t0 er ren/f0 oer is:plural
SFX t0 uucht iichten/f0 uucht is:plural
SFX t0 leg gen/f0 leg is:plural
SFX t0 ar ären/f0 ar is:plural
SFX t0 ch jen/f0 rch is:plural
SFX t0 t den/f0 [ei]t is:plural
SFX t0 tt dden/f0 tt is:plural
SFX t0 i en/f0 i is:plural
SFX t0 b pen/f0 b is:plural
SFX t0 f wen/f0 [^l]ef is:plural
SFX t0 ef wen/f0 lef is:plural
SFX t0 angscht ängschten/f0 angscht is:plural

SFX e0 N 85
SFX e0 aarm äerm aarm is:plural
SFX e0 aart äert aart is:plural
SFX e0 aascht äscht aascht is:plural
SFX e0 ascht äscht [^a]ascht is:plural
SFX e0 arsch ärsch [^a]arsch is:plural
SFX e0 ach éch [^aKk]ach is:plural
SFX e0 ack äck ack is:plural
SFX e0 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX e0 afen äfen/f0 afen is:plural
SFX e0 aff äff aff is:plural
SFX e0 ak äck ak is:plural
SFX e0 al äl al is:plural
SFX e0 all äll all is:plural
SFX e0 allem ällem allem is:plural
SFX e0 amm ämm amm is:plural
SFX e0 amp ämp [^Kkw]amp is:plural
SFX e0 amp ämm [Kkw]amp is:plural
SFX e0 ampf ämpf ampf is:plural
SFX e0 and änn and is:plural
SFX e0 ang äng ang is:plural
SFX e0 ank äng [^Rr]ank is:plural
SFX e0 anz änz anz is:plural
SFX e0 app äpp app is:plural
SFX e0 arm ärm [^ad]arm is:plural
SFX e0 ass ëss [Rr]ass is:plural
SFX e0 ass äss [^Rr]ass is:plural
SFX e0 att ätt [Pp]att is:plural
SFX e0 atz ätz atz is:plural
SFX e0 az ätz az is:plural
SFX e0 ag éi lag is:plural
SFX e0 och éch och is:plural
SFX e0 ock éck ock is:plural
SFX e0 omp ëmp omp is:plural
SFX e0 ond ënn ond is:plural
SFX e0 ong éng ong is:plural
SFX e0 onk éng [^Zz]onk is:plural
SFX e0 onsch ënsch onsch is:plural
SFX e0 orf ërf orf is:plural
SFX e0 oss ëss oss is:plural
SFX e0 ou éi ou is:plural
SFX e0 ouer éier ouer is:plural
SFX e0 oun éin oun is:plural
SFX e0 ount éint ount is:plural
SFX e0 ag äg rag is:plural
SFX e0 ot éit ot is:plural
SFX e0 auch äich auch is:plural
SFX e0 ouss éiss ouss is:plural
SFX e0 ant änn ant is:plural
SFX e0 or är or is:plural
SFX e0 oup éip oup is:plural
SFX e0 out éit out is:plural
SFX e0 ollef ëllef ollef is:plural
SFX e0 arm äerm darm is:plural
SFX e0 antel äntel antel is:plural
SFX e0 oscht ëscht oscht is:plural
SFX e0 aarsch äersch aarsch is:plural
SFX e0 auscht äischt auscht is:plural
SFX e0 ann änn ann is:plural
SFX e0 ochs échs ochs is:plural
SFX e0 als äls als is:plural
SFX e0 atz ëtz [Bb]atz is:plural
SFX e0 ouschter éischter ouschter is:plural
SFX e0 aut äit [^Hh]aut is:plural
SFX e0 aasser ässer aasser is:plural
SFX e0 ach äch [Kk]ach is:plural
SFX e0 andel ändel andel is:plural
SFX e0 akt äkt akt is:plural
SFX e0 off ëff off is:plural
SFX e0 oul éil oul is:plural
SFX e0 onft ënft onft is:plural
SFX e0 ank éng [Rr]ank is:plural
SFX e0 acht ächt acht is:plural
SFX e0 otz ëtz otz is:plural
SFX e0 oum éim oum is:plural
SFX e0 att ëtt natt is:plural
SFX e0 arg ärg arg is:plural
SFX e0 opp ëpp opp is:plural
SFX e0 apel äppel apel is:plural
SFX e0 aufel äifel aufel is:plural
SFX e0 uss ëss luss is:plural
SFX e0 o éi o is:plural
SFX e0 omb ëmb omb is:plural
SFX e0 oer eeër oer is:plural
SFX e0 auz äiz auz is:plural
SFX e0 onk énk [Zz]onk is:plural

SFX F0 N 2
SFX F0 r sch/n0 r is:feminine is:singular
SFX F0 rt sch/n0 rt is:feminine is:singular

SFX f0 Y 2
SFX f0 n 0 [^n]n is:eifeler
SFX f0 nn 0 nn is:eifeler

SFX k0 N 6
SFX k0 a en/f0 a is:plural
SFX k0 os en/f0 os is:plural
SFX k0 um en/f0 um is:plural
SFX k0 o en/f0 o is:plural
SFX k0 us en/f0 us is:plural
SFX k0 s en/f0 is is:plural

SFX M0 Y 3
SFX M0 s en/f0 [^ao]ss is:plural
SFX M0 oss sen/f0 oss is:plural
SFX M0 ass sen/f0 ass is:plural

SFX F6 N 3
SFX F6 0 in . is:feminine is:singular
SFX F6 0 innen . is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX F6 0 inne . is:feminine is:singular is:plural is:eifeler

SFX R0 N 3
SFX R0 0 er [^e] is:plural
SFX R0 n 0 äin is:eifeler
SFX R0 0 r e is:plural

SFX r0 N 2
SFX r0 n r . is:plural
SFX r0 n 0 . is:eifeler

SFX n1 N 19
SFX n1 0 ken/f0 c is:plural
SFX n1 0 fen/f0 f is:plural
SFX n1 0 gen/f0 g is:plural
SFX n1 k ken/f0 k is:plural
SFX n1 0 len/f0 l is:plural
SFX n1 e len/f0 le is:plural
SFX n1 0 men/f0 m is:plural
SFX n1 e men/f0 me is:plural
SFX n1 0 nen/f0 n is:plural
SFX n1 e nen/f0 ne is:plural
SFX n1 0 pen/f0 p is:plural
SFX n1 e pen/f0 pe is:plural
SFX n1 0 sen/f0 s is:plural
SFX n1 e sen/f0 se is:plural
SFX n1 0 ten/f0 t is:plural
SFX n1 e ten/f0 te is:plural
SFX n1 e fen/f0 fe is:plural
SFX n1 0 ben/f0 b is:plural
SFX n1 0 wen/f0 w is:plural

SFX R1 N 9
SFX R1 0 ker c is:plural
SFX R1 0 fer f is:plural
SFX R1 0 ler l is:plural
SFX R1 0 mer m is:plural
SFX R1 0 ser s is:plural
SFX R1 0 ter t is:plural
SFX R1 e ter te is:plural
SFX R1 e mer me is:plural
SFX R1 k ker k is:plural

SFX E0 N 2
SFX E0 0 ën . is:plural
SFX E0 0 ë . is:plural is:eifeler

SFX Q0 N 1
SFX Q0 0 ër . is:plural

SFX d0 N 7
SFX d0 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX d0 chen ercher [^r]chen is:plural
SFX d0 erchen rercher äerchen is:plural
SFX d0 chen ercher [^ä]erchen is:plural
SFX d0 jen ercher [^u]tjen is:plural
SFX d0 utjen tercher uutjen is:plural
SFX d0 jen ercher [^u]utjen is:plural
