lb_LU.dic
Äischer/F6
Audit/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bankgeheimnis/R1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Bankinstitut/R0 po:noun
Baueremusée/E0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Béchsert/n0F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Belgismus/k0n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Beruffsjoer/t0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Beruffswonsch/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bëschaarbechter/F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bichelchen/r0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bierkepollen/f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bootshaus/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Brommen/r0 po:noun
Buedemverhältnis/R1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Bushaischen/d0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Cale/n1 po:noun
Carbonarazooss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Case/E0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Chimiekonzern/R0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Däichwiss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Dauf/t0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Dokter/n0F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Drogeklinik/n1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Drogist/n0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Duebelalbum/n0k0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Eeleften/r0 po:noun
ëmgehaen/f0 po:verb
Emissiounsrecht/R0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Empfank/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ëmwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Enkelkand/u0T0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Ergebnis/R1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Europatournée/E0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Fënstermécher/F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fierkelshämmchen/d0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Finanzchef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fiselreen/f0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Flilleksschrauf/t0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Foiresgebai/R0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Fraeforum/n0k0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fräizäitsportler/F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Führerspréchelchen/r0 po:noun
Gärfaass/u0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gediechtnes/R1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Geessebaart/e0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geheimwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gemengewiss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Geschäftsdirekter/n0F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Grënnungsjoer/t0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Gruppebilljee/E0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Guckfënsterchen/r0 po:noun
Heeschemann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
héichliewen/f0 po:verb
Heroindealer/n0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hierzefrächen/d0 po:noun
Hispanismus/k0n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Holzfaarf/t0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Holzwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Houscht/R0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ielebou/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Illustréierten/r0 po:noun
Informatiksprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Inlandsvol/n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Insiderkrees/R1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Juddenzentrum/n0k0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kapëttchen/d0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kaplounshaus/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Kéiszooss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Klappjuegd/t0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Klischee/E0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kolmer/F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Konschtprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Krack/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Krämpchen/d0 po:noun
Leidenswee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Lëtzebuergeschen/f0 po:noun
Lëtzebuergeschkenntnes/R1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Liichtathletikmagasinn/n0R0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Liichtebengelchen/r0 po:noun
Logarithmus/k0n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Maartmann/u0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Magnetismus/k0n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Makréilchen/d0 po:noun
Mëllechbauer/n0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Moschterzooss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Motorsee/E0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Musterbréif/u0t0O0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nischemaart/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Noutdokter/n0F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Onkäschten/f0 po:noun ts:_plural
Onwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ozonlach/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Panewippchen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Parallelismus/k0n1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Parteipresident/n0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Passagéiertransport/R0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Pic/n1 po:noun
Réckfall/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Referenzpräis/R1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Rentekeess/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Resistenzmusée/E0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Risiko/n0k0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Rollen/r0 po:noun
Romanschrëftsteller/F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Scheedungsbréif/u0t0O0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schigebitt/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Schläichwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schockelaskleeschen/d0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schouldokter/n0F0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schoulsystem/R0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Septembermount/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sexualverhalen/f0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Site/n1 po:noun
Sojaszooss/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Stee/E0 po:noun
Summerwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Taass/M0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Tauchen/r0 po:noun
Trickdéif/t0I0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tuschbic/n1R1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Universitéitsgebai/R0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Vëlossportreporter/n0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Veräinskeess/M0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Verbraucherschutzminister/n0F0F6 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
vertrueden/f0 po:verb
Virbild/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Virbräitchen/d0 po:noun
Vizechef/n1F9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wahlkampthema/n0k0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wanderwee/Q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Widdersproch/e0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
zréckbliwwen/f0 po:verb
